Illinois, session 104th, HB2120.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Public Building Commission Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 1031)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Public Building Commission Act.9(Source: Laws 1955, p. 905.)